hu: Kompatibilis golfzsák típusa: Golfkocsi-táska; Junior táska; Ceruzatáska; Staff táska; Állványos táska; Sunday/hordozótáska; Egyéb
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta torbe za golf: Torba za kolica; Torba za juniore; Pencil torba; Staff torba; Torba sa stalkom; Sunday/carry torba; Ostalo
th: ประเภทถุงกอล์ฟที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: กระเป๋ากอล์ฟสำหรับรถลาก; กระเป๋ากอล์ฟสำหรับเด็ก; กระเป๋ากอล์ฟทรงดินสอ; กระเป๋ากอล์ฟแบบ Staff; กระเป๋ากอล์ฟแบบขาตั้ง; กระเป๋า Sunday/กระเป๋าถือ; อื่นๆ
nb: Kompatibel golfvesketype: Trallebag; Juniorbag; Pencil-bag; Staff-bag; Bærebag; Sunday-/bærebag; Annet
fi: Yhteensopiva golfbägin tyyppi: Kärrybägi; Junioribägi; Pencil-bägi; Staff-bägi; Kantobägi; Sunday- / kantobägi; Muu
es: Tipo de bolsa de golf compatible: Bolsa para carrito; Bolsa juvenil; Bolsa tipo lápiz; Bolsa de staff; Bolsa con soporte; Bolsa de domingo/transporte; Otro
ja: 対応ゴルフバッグタイプ: カートバッグ; ジュニアバッグ; ペンシルバッグ; スタッフバッグ; スタンドバッグ; サンデー/キャリーバッグ; その他
zh-TW: 相容高爾夫球袋類型: 球車袋; 兒童球袋; 鉛筆型球袋; 職業球袋; 腳架球袋; 週日球袋/手提球袋; 其他
de: Kompatibler Golftaschentyp: Cart-Bag; Junior-Bag; Pencil-Bag; Staff-Bag; Standbag; Sunday-/Carry-Bag; Sonstige
pl: Zgodny typ torby golfowej: Torba na wózek; Torba dla juniorów; Torba typu pencil; Torba typu staff; Torba typu stand; Torba typu Sunday/do noszenia; Inne
cs: Kompatibilní typy golfových tašek: Cart bag; Juniorský bag; Pencil bag; Staff bag; Stand bag; Sunday/Carry bag; Jiné
zh-CN: 适用高尔夫球包类型: 球车包; 青少年球包; 铅笔型球包; 职业球包; 支架球包; 周日球包/手提球包; 其他
da: Kompatibel golftasketype: Vognbag; Juniorbag; Pencilbag; Staff bag; Standbag; Sunday-/bærebag; Andet
bg-BG: Съвместим тип голф чанта: Чанта за количка; Младежка чанта; Чанта тип молив; Професионална чанта (Staff bag); Чанта със стойка; Sunday/чанта за носене; Друго
it: Tipo di borsa da golf compatibile: Sacca da carrello; Sacca junior; Sacca pencil; Sacca staff; Sacca stand; Sacca Sunday/da trasporto; Altro
ru: Совместимый тип сумки для гольфа: Сумка для тележки; Детская сумка; Сумка-карандаш; Сумка Staff; Сумка с подставкой; Воскресная сумка / сумка для переноски; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de saco de golfe compatível: Saco de carrinho; Saco júnior; Saco lápis; Saco de equipa; Saco com tripé; Saco de domingo/transporte; Outro
tr: Uyumlu golf çantası tipi: Taşıma arabası çantası; Genç çantası; Kalem çantası; Profesyonel çanta; Standlı çanta; Hafif taşıma çantası; Diğer
en: Compatible golf bag type: Cart bag; Junior bag; Pencil bag; Staff bag; Stand bag; Sunday/Carry bag; Other
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ golfovej tašky: Bag na vozík; Juniorský bag; Pencil bag; Bag typu Staff; Bag so stojanom; Nedeľný bag/bag na nosenie; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de geantă de golf compatibil: Geantă pentru cărucior; Geantă pentru juniori; Geantă tip creion; Geantă staff; Geantă cu suport; Geantă Sunday/de transport; Altele
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta torbe za golf: Torba za na voziček; Mladinska torba; Ozka torba (pencil); Torba staff; Torba s stojalom; Torba Sunday/torba za nošenje; Drugo
nl: Compatibel type golftas: Cartbag; Juniortas; Pencilbag; Staffbag; Standbag; Sunday-/draagtas; Overig
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo golfo krepšys: Vežimėlio krepšys; Jaunimo krepšys; Pieštuko formos krepšys; „Staff“ tipo krepšys; Pastatomas krepšys; „Sunday“ / nešamas krepšys; Kita
ko: 호환 골프백 유형: 카트 백; 주니어 백; 펜슬 백; 스태프 백; 스탠드 백; 선데이/캐리 백; 기타
fr: Type de sac de golf compatible: Sac pour chariot; Sac junior; Sac fourreau; Sac staff; Sac trépied; Sac de transport/Sunday; Autre
el: Συμβατός τύπος τσάντας γκολφ: Τσάντα για καροτσάκι; Παιδική τσάντα; Τσάντα pencil; Τσάντα staff; Τσάντα με βάση; Τσάντα μεταφοράς/sunday; Άλλο
vi: Loại túi gậy golf tương thích: Túi đi xe cart; Túi cho trẻ em; Túi ống (pencil bag); Túi staff; Túi đứng; Túi đeo Sunday; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de bolsa de golfe compatível: Bolsa para carrinho; Bolsa júnior; Bolsa tipo lápis; Bolsa tipo staff; Bolsa com tripé; Bolsa sunday/de carregar; Outro
sv: Kompatibel golfväsketyp: Vagnbag; Juniorbag; Pencilbag; Staffbag; Bärbag; Sundaybag/bärbag; Övrigt